Utah statutes.
54-4a-6.   Objectives.

In the performance of the duties, powers, and responsibilities committed to it by law, the Division of Public Utilities shall act in the public interest in order to provide the Public Service Commission with objective and comprehensive information, evidence, and recommendations consistent with the following objectives:

(1)  promote the safe, healthy, economic, efficient, and reliable operation of all public utilities and their services, instrumentalities, equipment, and facilities;

(2)  provide for just, reasonable, and adequate rates, charges, classifications, rules, regulations, practices, and services of public utilities;

(3)  make the regulatory process as simple and understandable as possible so that it is acceptable to the public; feasible, expeditious, and efficient to apply; and designed to minimize controversies over interpretation and application;

(4)  for purposes of guiding the activities of the Division of Public Utilities, the phrase "just, reasonable, and adequate" encompasses, but is not limited to the following criteria:

(a)  maintain the financial integrity of public utilities by assuring a sufficient and fair rate of return;

(b)  promote efficient management and operation of public utilities;

(c)  protect the long-range interest of consumers in obtaining continued quality and adequate levels of service at the lowest cost consistent with the other provisions of Subsection (4).

(d)  provide for fair apportionment of the total cost of service among customer categories and individual customers and prevent undue discrimination in rate relationships;

(e)  promote stability in rate levels for customers and revenue requirements for utilities from year to year; and

(f)  protect against wasteful use of public utility services.



Enacted by Chapter 246, 1983 General Session

